dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Cn Y 80
SFX Cn ти л .
SFX Cn ти ла .
SFX Cn ти ло .
SFX Cn ти ли .
SFX Cn евати ују .
SFX Cn евати ујем .
SFX Cn евати ујеш .
SFX Cn евати ује .
SFX Cn евати ујемо .
SFX Cn евати ујете .
SFX Cn евати ујут .
SFX Cn ти х .
SFX Cn ти ше .
SFX Cn ти хмо .
SFX Cn ти сте .
SFX Cn ти ху .
SFX Cn евати уј .
SFX Cn евати ујмо .
SFX Cn евати ујте .
SFX Cn евати ујучи .
SFX Cn евати ујучего .
SFX Cn евати ујучему .
SFX Cn евати ујучим .
SFX Cn евати ујучем .
SFX Cn евати ујучих .
SFX Cn евати ујучими .
SFX Cn евати ујуча .
SFX Cn евати ујучу .
SFX Cn евати ујучеј .
SFX Cn евати ујучеју .
SFX Cn евати ујуче .
SFX Cn евати ујемы .
SFX Cn евати ујемого .
SFX Cn евати ујемому .
SFX Cn евати ујемым .
SFX Cn евати ујемом .
SFX Cn евати ујемо .
SFX Cn евати ујема .
SFX Cn евати ујему .
SFX Cn евати ујемој .
SFX Cn евати ујемоју .
SFX Cn евати ујеми .
SFX Cn евати ујеме .
SFX Cn евати ујемых .
SFX Cn евати ујемым .
SFX Cn евати ујемыми .
SFX Cn ти вши .
SFX Cn ти вшего .
SFX Cn ти вшему .
SFX Cn ти вшим .
SFX Cn ти вшем .
SFX Cn ти вших .
SFX Cn ти вшими .
SFX Cn ти вша .
SFX Cn ти вшу .
SFX Cn ти вшеј .
SFX Cn ти вшеју .
SFX Cn ти вше .
SFX Cn ти ны .
SFX Cn ти ного .
SFX Cn ти ному .
SFX Cn ти ным .
SFX Cn ти ном .
SFX Cn ти ни .
SFX Cn ти не .
SFX Cn ти ных .
SFX Cn ти ными .
SFX Cn ти на .
SFX Cn ти ну .
SFX Cn ти ној .
SFX Cn ти ноју .
SFX Cn ти но .
SFX Cn ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Cn ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Cn ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Cn ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Cn ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Cn ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Cn ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Cn ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX Co Y 11
SFX Co 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Co 0 и/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Co г же/xPxE .

SFX Cp Y 9
SFX Cp 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cp 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Cp олј лј/xPxE .
SFX Cp олј лја/xPxE .
SFX Cp 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Cp олј лју/xPxE .
SFX Cp 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Cp олј лјем/xPxE .
SFX Cp 0 ем/xPxE .

SFX Cq Y 13
SFX Cq ы о .
SFX Cq ы а .
SFX Cq ы ого .
SFX Cq ы у .
SFX Cq ы ој .
SFX Cq ы ом .
SFX Cq ы ому .
SFX Cq 0 м .
SFX Cq ы оју .
SFX Cq ы и .
SFX Cq ы е .
SFX Cq 0 х .
SFX Cq 0 ми .

SFX Cr Y 21
SFX Cr 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Cr оз з/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз зы/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз за/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз зов/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз зу/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз зах/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз зам/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз зом/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз зами/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Cr оз зе/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 е/xPxE .

SFX Cs Y 3
SFX Cs и єх .
SFX Cs и єм .
SFX Cs и єми .

SFX Ct Y 80
SFX Ct ти л .
SFX Ct ти ла .
SFX Ct ти ло .
SFX Ct ти ли .
SFX Ct обрати беру .
SFX Ct обрати берем .
SFX Ct обрати береш .
SFX Ct обрати бере .
SFX Ct обрати беремо .
SFX Ct обрати берете .
SFX Ct обрати берут .
SFX Ct ти х .
SFX Ct ти ше .
SFX Ct ти хмо .
SFX Ct ти сте .
SFX Ct ти ху .
SFX Ct обрати бери .
SFX Ct обрати беримо .
SFX Ct обрати берите .
SFX Ct обрати беручи .
SFX Ct обрати беручего .
SFX Ct обрати беручему .
SFX Ct обрати беручим .
SFX Ct обрати беручем .
SFX Ct обрати беручих .
SFX Ct обрати беручими .
SFX Ct обрати беруча .
SFX Ct обрати беручу .
SFX Ct обрати беручеј .
SFX Ct обрати беручеју .
SFX Ct обрати беруче .
SFX Ct обрати беремы .
SFX Ct обрати беремого .
SFX Ct обрати беремому .
SFX Ct обрати беремым .
SFX Ct обрати беремом .
SFX Ct обрати беремо .
SFX Ct обрати берема .
SFX Ct обрати берему .
SFX Ct обрати беремој .
SFX Ct обрати беремоју .
SFX Ct обрати береми .
SFX Ct обрати береме .
SFX Ct обрати беремых .
SFX Ct обрати беремым .
SFX Ct обрати беремыми .
SFX Ct ти вши .
SFX Ct ти вшего .
SFX Ct ти вшему .
SFX Ct ти вшим .
SFX Ct ти вшем .
SFX Ct ти вших .
SFX Ct ти вшими .
SFX Ct ти вша .
SFX Ct ти вшу .
SFX Ct ти вшеј .
SFX Ct ти вшеју .
SFX Ct ти вше .
SFX Ct ти ны .
SFX Ct ти ного .
SFX Ct ти ному .
SFX Ct ти ным .
SFX Ct ти ном .
SFX Ct ти ни .
SFX Ct ти не .
SFX Ct ти ных .
SFX Ct ти ными .
SFX Ct ти на .
SFX Ct ти ну .
SFX Ct ти ној .
SFX Ct ти ноју .
SFX Ct ти но .
SFX Ct ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Ct ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Ct ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Ct ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Ct ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Ct ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Ct ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Ct ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX Cu Y 6
SFX Cu 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cu и о/xPxBxO .
SFX Cu 0 ј/xPxE .
SFX Cu и ах/xPxE .
SFX Cu и ам/xPxE .
SFX Cu и ами/xPxE .

SFX Cv Y 6
SFX Cv 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cv 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Cv 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Cv 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Cv 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Cv г же/xPxE .

SFX Cw Y 53
SFX Cw ети л .
SFX Cw ети ла .
SFX Cw ети ло .
SFX Cw ети ли .
SFX Cw рети еру .
SFX Cw рети ерем .
SFX Cw рети ереш .
SFX Cw рети ере .
SFX Cw рети еремо .
SFX Cw рети ерете .
SFX Cw рети ерут .
SFX Cw ти х .
SFX Cw ти ше .
SFX Cw ти хмо .
SFX Cw ти сте .
SFX Cw ти ху .
SFX Cw рети ери .
SFX Cw рети еримо .
SFX Cw рети ерите .
SFX Cw рети еручи .
SFX Cw рети еручего .
SFX Cw рети еручему .
SFX Cw рети еручим .
SFX Cw рети еручем .
SFX Cw рети еручих .
SFX Cw рети еручими .
SFX Cw рети еруча .
SFX Cw рети еручу .
SFX Cw рети еручеј .
SFX Cw рети еручеју .
SFX Cw рети еруче .
SFX Cw рети еремы .
SFX Cw рети еремого .
SFX Cw рети еремому .
SFX Cw рети еремым .
SFX Cw рети еремом .
SFX Cw рети еремо .
SFX Cw рети ерема .
SFX Cw рети ерему .
SFX Cw рети еремој .
SFX Cw рети еремоју .
SFX Cw рети ереми .
SFX Cw рети ереме .
SFX Cw рети еремых .
SFX Cw рети еремым .
SFX Cw рети еремыми .
SFX Cw ети ши .
SFX Cw ети ша .
SFX Cw ети ше .
SFX Cw ети ты .
SFX Cw ети та .
SFX Cw ети то .
SFX Cw ети тје .

SFX Cx Y 6
SFX Cx 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cx а о/xPxBxO .
SFX Cx а 0 .
SFX Cx 0 х/xPxE .
SFX Cx 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Cx 0 ми/xPxE .

SFX Cy Y 12
SFX Cy ј 0 .
SFX Cy ој а .
SFX Cy ј го .
SFX Cy ој у .
SFX Cy ј м .
SFX Cy ј му .
SFX Cy ој ым .
SFX Cy 0 у .
SFX Cy ој и .
SFX Cy ој е .
SFX Cy ој ых .
SFX Cy ој ыми .

SFX Cz Y 12
SFX Cz 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cz е о/xPxBxO .
SFX Cz 0 та/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 те/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 т/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 ти/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 ту/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 тах/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 там/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 тем/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 том/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 тами/xPxE .

SFX DA Y 6
SFX DA 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DA е е/xPxBxO .
SFX DA е 0 .
SFX DA е ах/xPxE .
SFX DA е ам/xPxE .
SFX DA е ами/xPxE .

SFX DB Y 12
SFX DB ес се .
SFX DB ес са .
SFX DB ес сего .
SFX DB ес су .
SFX DB ес сеј .
SFX DB ес сем .
SFX DB ес сему .
SFX DB ес сим .
SFX DB ес сеју .
SFX DB ес си .
SFX DB ес сих .
SFX DB ес сими .

SFX DC Y 71
SFX DC и л .
SFX DC и ла .
SFX DC и ло .
SFX DC и ли .
SFX DC и у .
SFX DC и ем .
SFX DC и еш .
SFX DC и е .
SFX DC и емо .
SFX DC и ете .
SFX DC и ут .
SFX DC и ех .
SFX DC и еше .
SFX DC и ехмо .
SFX DC и есте .
SFX DC и еху .
SFX DC 0 мо .
SFX DC 0 те .
SFX DC и учи .
SFX DC и учего .
SFX DC и учему .
SFX DC и учим .
SFX DC и учем .
SFX DC и учих .
SFX DC и учими .
SFX DC и уча .
SFX DC и учу .
SFX DC и учеј .
SFX DC и учеју .
SFX DC и уче .
SFX DC и омы .
SFX DC и омого .
SFX DC и омому .
SFX DC и омым .
SFX DC и омом .
SFX DC и омо .
SFX DC и ома .
SFX DC и ому .
SFX DC и омој .
SFX DC и омоју .
SFX DC и оми .
SFX DC и оме .
SFX DC и омых .
SFX DC и омым .
SFX DC и омыми .
SFX DC и омо .
SFX DC и ши .
SFX DC и ша .
SFX DC и ше .
SFX DC и ены .
SFX DC и еного .
SFX DC и еному .
SFX DC и еным .
SFX DC и еном .
SFX DC и ени .
SFX DC и ене .
SFX DC и еных .
SFX DC и еными .
SFX DC и ена .
SFX DC и ену .
SFX DC и еној .
SFX DC и еноју .
SFX DC и ено .
SFX DC и енје/xPxE .
SFX DC и енја/xPxE .
SFX DC и енју/xPxE .
SFX DC и енјем/xPxE .
SFX DC и ениј/xPxE .
SFX DC и енјам/xPxE .
SFX DC и енјами/xPxE .
SFX DC и енјах/xPxE .
