dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
уполномочевати/Cn
метеоролог/Co
вуголј/Cp
какы/Cq
боз/Cr
три/Cs
собрати/Ct
новости/Cu
југ/Cv
дрети/Cw
уста/Cx
тутој/Cy
јагне/Cz
дрождже/DA
клєшче/DA
вес/DB
израсти/DC
врата/Cx
лјуди/Cu
идеолог/Co
тамтој/Cy
завојевати/Cn
бојевати/Cn
еколог/Co
кторы/Cq
луксембург/Cv
бог/Co
четыри/Cs
тој/Cy
двери/Cu
расти/DC
собрати/Ct
ночевати/Cn
биолог/Co
кторы/Cq
прєночевати/Cn
археолог/Co
невролог/Co
дєти/Cu
малјевати/Cn
ножице/DA
војевати/Cn
јихны/Cq
двојчета/Cx
прєрасти/DC
супруг/Co
вєсти/Cu
враг/Co
зарасти/DC
друг/Co
јетра/Cx
лєта/Cx
теле/Cz
шестерчета/Cx
тројчета/Cx
прасе/Cz
жрєбе/Cz
дорасти/DC
возрасти/DC
четверчета/Cx
петерчета/Cx
тројны/Cq
четверны/Cq
петерны/Cq
шестерны/Cq
двојакы/Cq
тројакы/Cq
четверакы/Cq
петеракы/Cq
шестеракы/Cq
гуслје/DA
психолог/Co
финанције/DA
хирург/Co
кате/Cz
срасти/DC
смети/Cu
теолог/Co
оној/Cy
једнорог/Co
околице/DA
раздрети/Cw
танцевати/Cn
носорог/Co
внутрности/Cu
астролог/Co
ногавице/DA
папуче/DA
радиолог/Co
геолог/Co
педагог/Co
поструг/Co
социолог/Co
порасти/DC
дрва/Cx
грабје/DA
гусе/Cz
јелене/Cz
кабаре/Cz
коте/Cz
козорог/Co
лјве/Cz
лисе/Cz
младе/Cz
нарасти/DC
обојакы/Cq
обрасти/DC
обсег/Cv
оддрети/Cw
орле/Cz
осле/Cz
разрасти/DC
вакације/DA
валјцевати/Cn
варјаг/Co
викинг/Co
зоолог/Co
виролог/Co
шчене/Cz
пингпонг/Cv
обдрети/Cw
сдрети/Cw
бичевати/Cn
понєкторы/Cq
наочила/Cx
дистанцевати/Cn
продрети/Cw
осмоног/Co
аранжевати/Cn
санје/DA
зимбабве/Cz
линчевати/Cn
